Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 6

Distributions and Withdrawal

61-2-601. Interim distributions.

Except as provided in this part, a partner is entitled to receive distributions from a limited partnership before his withdrawal from the limited partnership and before the dissolution and winding up thereof to the extent and at the times or upon the happening of the events specified in the partnership agreement.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-602. Withdrawal of general partner.

A general partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at any time by giving written notice to the other partners, but if the withdrawal violates the partnership agreement, the limited partnership may recover from the withdrawing general partner damages for breach of the partnership agreement and offset the damages against the amount otherwise distributable to him, in addition to any remedies otherwise available under applicable law.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-603. Withdrawal of limited partner.

A limited partner may withdraw from a limited partnership at the time or upon the happening of events specified in the partnership agreement and in accordance with the partnership agreement.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 52; 1997, ch. 199, § 1.

61-2-604. Distribution upon withdrawal.

Except as provided in this part, upon withdrawal any withdrawing partner is entitled to receive any distribution to which he is entitled under the partnership agreement and, if not otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, he is entitled to receive, within a reasonable time after withdrawal, the fair value of his interest in the limited partnership as of the date of withdrawal based upon his right to share in distributions from the limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-605. Distribution in kind.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner, regardless of the nature of his contribution, has no right to demand and receive any distribution from a limited partnership in any form other than cash. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind from a limited partnership to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to him exceeds a percentage of that asset, which is equal to the percentage in which he shares in distributions from the limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-606. Right to distribution.

Subject to §§ 61-2-607 and 61-2-804, and unless otherwise provided in the partnership agreement, at the time a partner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, he has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the limited partnership with respect to the distribution. A partnership agreement may provide for the establishment of a record date with respect to allocations and distributions by a limited partnership.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 53, 54.

61-2-607. Limitations on distribution.

A limited partnership shall not make a distribution to a partner to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited partnership, other than liabilities to partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the limited partnership, exceed the fair value of the assets of the limited partnership, except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the limited partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability.

A limited partner who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (a), and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (a), shall be liable to the limited partnership for the amount of the distribution. A limited partner who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (a), and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (a), shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (c), this subsection (b) shall not affect any obligation or liability of a limited partner under a partnership agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a limited partner who receives a distribution from a limited partnership shall have no liability under this chapter or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three (3) years from the date of the distribution.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, § 55.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-608. Priority between limited partners.

Where there are several limited partners, the members may agree that one (1) or more of the limited partners shall have a priority over other limited partners as to the return of their contributions, as to their compensation by way of income, or as to any other matter. If such an agreement is made, it shall be stated in the partnership agreement, and in the absence of such a statement, all the limited partners shall stand upon equal footing.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; T.C.A., § 61-2-609; Acts 1989, ch. 270, § 56.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 61-2-608 (Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1), concerning liability upon return of contribution, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 270, § 56.

61-2-609. Classes and voting.

A partnership agreement may provide for classes or groups of partners, both general and limited, having such relative rights, powers and duties as the partnership agreement may provide, and may make provisions for the future creation in the manner provided in the partnership agreement of additional classes or groups of partners having such relative rights, powers and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights, powers and duties senior to existing classes and groups of partners.

Subject to § 61-2-302, the partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified partners, both general and limited, or a specified class or group of the partners the right to vote separately or with all or any class or group of the partners, on any matter. Voting by limited partners may be on a per capita, number, financial interest, class, group or any other basis.

A partnership agreement which grants a right to vote may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any partner, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote. If provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners may make a recommendation on any proper proposal and require response within a specified time, but not less than thirty (30) days, and provide that failure to respond within the specified time shall constitute a vote which is consistent with the general partners' recommendation with respect to the proposal. A partnership agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the partnership agreement, without the vote or approval of any particular general or limited partner or class or group of general or limited partners, including the creation under the provisions of the partnership agreement of a class or group of partnership interests that was not previously outstanding.

Any right or power, including voting rights, granted to limited partners as permitted under § 61-2-302 shall be deemed to be permitted by this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; T.C.A., § 61-2-610; Acts 1989, ch. 270, §§ 57-59.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 61-2-609 was transferred to § 61-2-608 in 1989.